Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.041, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibition on American Indian mascots. (a) Starting September 1, 2026, a public school may not have or adopt a name, symbol, or image that depicts or refers to an American Indian Tribe, individual, custom, or tradition to be used as a mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, or team name of the school, district, or school within the district, unless the school has obtained an exemption under subdivision 3. (b) The prohibition in paragraph (a) does not apply to a public school located within the reservation of a federally recognized Tribal Nation in Minnesota, where at least 95 percent of students meet the state definition of American Indian student. (c) A school district with a prohibited American Indian mascot according to paragraph (a), that has not received an exemption according to subdivision 3, must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education policy by February 14, 2025, and again by February 1, 2026, on the district's progress to comply with this section; and the district must submit copies of the reports to the Legislative Reference Library. The reports must include the following: (1) confirmation that the district has removed the American Indian mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, or team name from the district website; (2) confirmation that the board of the district has approved a new mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, or team name; (3) a summary of the district's progress on removing the American Indian mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, or team name from uniforms, equipment, signs, elements of facilities, and other district items; and (4) a summary of resources necessary to comply with the prohibition in paragraph (a) and the district's plan to raise and allocate any necessary funds. new text begin (d) The commissioner must establish a process for a public school to apply for funding to make changes necessary to replace a prohibited name, symbol, or image on uniforms, signs, paintings, equipment, gym floors, websites, and other school property, including supplies and other building surfaces. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner may approve an application to reimburse a school for amounts expended to comply with paragraph (a) after July 1, 2023, and for expenses a public school has incurred based on a work plan and budget approved by the commissioner. The commissioner must provide a public school with the funding requested within 30 days of approving the school's work plan and budget. A public school that applies to the commissioner for mascot replacement assistance is not required to comply with the prohibition in paragraph (a) until the commissioner has approved the request. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MASCOT REPLACEMENT FUNDING.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Mascot replacement assistance. new text end new text begin (a) For assistance to public schools seeking to comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.041: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until July 1, 2028. new text end